North Dakota statutes. TITLE 38 Mining and Gas and Oil Production
CHAPTER 38-08 Control of Gas and Oil Resources

38-08-01.
Declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared to be in the public interest to foster, to encourage, and to promote the development, production, and utilization of natural resources of oil and gas in the state in such a manner as will prevent waste; to authorize and to provide for the operation and development of oil and gas properties in such a manner that a greater ultimate recovery of oil and gas be had and that the correlative rights of all owners be fully protected; and to encourage and to authorize cycling, recycling, pressure maintenance, and secondary recovery operations in order that the greatest possible economic recovery of oil and gas be obtained within the state to the end that the landowners, the royalty owners, the producers, and the general public realize and enjoy the greatest possible good from these vital natural resources.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0801.

38-08-02.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Abandoned pipeline” means an underground gathering pipeline that is no longer in service, is physically disconnected from in-service facilities, and is not intended to be reactivated for future use.

“Certificate of clearance” means a permit prescribed by the commission for the transportation or the delivery of oil or gas or product and issued or registered in accordance with the rule, regulation, or order requiring such permit.

“Commission” means the industrial commission.

“Field” means the general area underlaid by one or more pools.

“Gas” means and includes all natural gas and all other fluid hydrocarbons not hereinbelow defined as oil.

“Illegal gas” means gas which has been produced from any well within this state in excess of the quantity permitted by any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, or any gas produced or removed from the well premises in violation of any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, or any gas produced or removed from the well premises without the knowledge and consent of the operator.

“Illegal oil” means oil which has been produced from any well within the state in excess of the quantity permitted by any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, or any oil produced or removed from the well premises in violation of any rule, regulation, or order of the commission, or any oil produced or removed from the well premises without the knowledge and consent of the operator.

“Illegal product” means any product derived in whole or in part from illegal oil or illegal gas.

“Oil” means and includes crude petroleum oil and other hydrocarbons regardless of gravity which are produced at the wellhead in liquid form and the liquid hydrocarbons known as distillate or condensate recovered or extracted from gas, other than gas produced in association with oil and commonly known as casinghead gas.

“Owner” means the person who has the right to drill into and produce from a pool and to appropriate the oil or gas the person produces therefrom either for that person or others or for that person and others.

“Person” means and includes any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, association, partnership, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, fiduciary, or other representative of any kind, and includes any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state or of any governmental subdivision thereof; the masculine gender, in referring to a person, includes the feminine and the neuter genders.

“Pipeline facility” means a pipeline, pump, compressor, storage, and any other facility, structure, and property incidental and necessary or useful in the interconnection of a pipeline or for the transportation, distribution, and delivery of energy-related commodities to points of sale or consumption or to the point of distribution for consumption located within or outside of this state.

“Pool” means an underground reservoir containing a common accumulation of oil or gas or both; each zone of a structure which is completely separated from any other zone in the same structure is a pool, as that term is used in this chapter.

“Producer” means the owner of a well or wells capable of producing oil or gas or both.

“Product” means any commodity made from oil or gas and includes refined crude oil, crude tops, topped crude, processed crude, processed crude petroleum, residue from crude petroleum, cracking stock, uncracked fuel oil, fuel oil, treated crude oil, residuum, gas oil, casinghead gasoline, natural-gas gasoline, kerosene, benzine, wash oil, waste oil, blended gasoline, lubricating oil, blends or mixtures of oil with one or more liquid products or byproducts derived from oil or gas, and blends or mixtures of two or more liquid products or byproducts derived from oil or gas, whether hereinabove enumerated or not.

“Reasonable market demand” means the demand for oil or gas for reasonable current requirements for consumption and use within and without the state, together with such quantities as are reasonably necessary for building up or maintaining reasonable working stocks and reasonable reserves of oil or gas or product.

“Reserve pit” means an excavated area used to contain drill cuttings accumulated during oil and gas drilling operations and mud-laden oil and gas drilling fluids used to confine oil, gas, or water to its native strata during the drilling of an oil and gas well.

“Underground gathering pipeline” means an underground gas or liquid pipeline with associated above ground equipment which is designed for or capable of transporting crude oil, natural gas, carbon dioxide, or water produced in association with oil and gas which is not subject to chapter 49-22.1. As used in this subsection, “associated above ground equipment” means equipment and property located above ground level, which is incidental to and necessary for or useful for transporting crude oil, natural gas, carbon dioxide, or water produced in association with oil and gas from a production facility. As used in this subsection, “equipment and property” includes a pump, a compressor, storage, leak detection or monitoring equipment, and any other facility or structure.

“Waste” means and includes:

Physical waste, as that term is generally understood in the oil and gas industry.

The inefficient, excessive, or improper use of, or the unnecessary dissipation of reservoir energy.

The locating, spacing, drilling, equipping, operating, or producing of any oil or gas well or wells in a manner which causes, or tends to cause, reduction in the quantity of oil or gas ultimately recoverable from a pool under prudent and proper operations, or which causes or tends to cause unnecessary or excessive surface loss or destruction of oil or gas.

The inefficient storing of oil.

The production of oil or gas in excess of transportation or marketing facilities or in excess of reasonable market demand.

The word “and” includes the word “or” and the use of the word “or” includes the word “and”. The use of the plural includes the singular and the use of the singular includes the plural.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0802; S.L. 1987, ch. 422, § 1; 1993, ch. 54, § 106; 1995, ch. 356, § 1; 2013, ch. 277, § 1; 2015, ch. 254, § 1, effective April 20, 2015; 2017, ch. 328, § 4, effective July 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 254, S.L. 2015 became effective April 20, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 10 of chapter 254, S.L. 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 11 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act does not apply to the reclamation of an oil or gas-related pipeline or associated facility put into service before August 1, 1983.”

38-08-03.
Waste prohibited.

Waste of oil and gas is prohibited.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0803.

Law Reviews.

North Dakota Law Review: Energy Symposium: Article: Development’s Victim Or Its Beneficiary?: The Impact Of Oil And Gas Development On The Fort Berthold Indian Reservation, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 535 (2011).

38-08-04.
Jurisdiction of commission.

The commission has continuing jurisdiction and authority over all persons and property, public and private, necessary to enforce effectively the provisions of this chapter. The commission has authority, and it is its duty, to make such investigations as it deems proper to determine whether waste exists or is imminent or whether other facts exist which justify action by the commission. The commission has the authority:

To require:

Identification of ownership of oil or gas wells, producing leases, tanks, plants, structures, and facilities for the transportation or refining of oil and gas.

The making and filing with the industrial commission of all resistivity, radioactivity, and mechanical well logs and the filing of directional surveys, if taken, and the filing of reports on well location, drilling, and production.

The drilling, casing, operation, and plugging of wells in such manner as to prevent the escape of oil or gas out of one stratum into another, the intrusion of water into oil or gas strata, the pollution of freshwater supplies by oil, gas, or saltwater, and to prevent blowouts, cavings, seepages, and fires.

The furnishing of a reasonable bond with good and sufficient surety, conditioned upon the full compliance with this chapter, and the rules and orders of the industrial commission, including without limitation a bond covering the operation of any underground gathering pipeline transferring oil or produced water from a production facility for disposal, storage, or sale purposes, except that if the commission requires a bond to be furnished, the person required to furnish the bond may elect to deposit under such terms and conditions as the industrial commission may prescribe a collateral bond, self-bond, cash, or any alternative form of security approved by the commission, or combination thereof, by which an operator assures faithful performance of all requirements of this chapter and the rules and orders of the industrial commission.

That the production from wells be separated into gaseous and liquid hydrocarbons, and that each be accurately measured by such means and upon such standards as may be prescribed by the commission.

The operation of wells with efficient gas-oil and water-oil ratios, and to fix these ratios.

Certificates of clearance in connection with the transportation or delivery of oil, gas, or any product.

Metering or other measuring of oil, gas, or product related to production in pipelines, gathering systems, storage tanks, barge terminals, loading racks, refineries, or other places, by meters or other measuring devices approved by the commission.

Every person who produces, sells, purchases, acquires, stores, transports, refines, disposes of, or processes oil, gas, saltwater, or other related oilfield fluids in this state to keep and maintain within this state complete and accurate records of the quantities thereof, which records must be available for examination by the commission or its agents at all reasonable times, and to file with the commission reports as the commission may prescribe with respect to oil or gas or the products thereof. An oil and gas production report need not be notarized but must be signed by the person submitting the report.

The payment of fees for services performed. The amount of the fee shall be set by the commission based on the anticipated actual cost of the service rendered. Unless otherwise provided by statute, all fees collected by the commission must be deposited in the general fund of this state, according to procedures established by the state treasurer.

The filing free of charge of samples and core chips and of complete cores when requested in the office of the state geologist within six months after the completion or abandonment of the well.

The placing of wells in abandoned-well status which have not produced oil or natural gas in paying quantities for one year. A well in abandoned-well status must be promptly returned to production in paying quantities, approved by the commission for temporarily abandoned status, or plugged and reclaimed within six months. If none of the three preceding conditions are met, the industrial commission may require the well to be placed immediately on a single-well bond in an amount equal to the cost of plugging the well and reclaiming the well site. In setting the bond amount, the commission shall use information from recent plugging and reclamation operations. After a well has been in abandoned-well status for one year, the well’s equipment, all well-related equipment at the well site, and salable oil at the well site are subject to forfeiture by the commission. If the commission exercises this authority, section 38-08-04.9 applies. After a well has been in abandoned-well status for one year, the single-well bond referred to above, or any other bond covering the well if the single-well bond has not been obtained, is subject to forfeiture by the commission. A surface owner may request a review of the temporarily abandoned status of a well that has been on temporarily abandoned status for at least seven years. The commission shall require notice and hearing to review the temporarily abandoned status. After notice and hearing, the surface owner may request a review of the temporarily abandoned status every two years.

To regulate:

The drilling, producing, and plugging of wells, the restoration of drilling and production sites, and all other operations for the production of oil or gas.

The shooting and chemical treatment of wells.

The spacing of wells.

Operations to increase ultimate recovery such as cycling of gas, the maintenance of pressure, and the introduction of gas, water, or other substances into producing formations.

Disposal of saltwater and oilfield wastes.

The commission shall give all affected counties written notice of hearings in such matters at least fifteen days before the hearing.

The commission may consider, in addition to other authority granted under this section, safety of the location and road access to saltwater disposal wells, treating plants, and all associated facilities.

The underground storage of oil or gas.

To limit and to allocate the production of oil and gas from any field, pool, or area and to establish and define as separate marketing districts those contiguous areas within the state which supply oil and gas to different markets, and to limit and allocate the production of oil and gas for each separate marketing district.

To classify wells as oil or gas wells for purposes material to the interpretation or enforcement of this chapter, to classify and determine the status and depth of wells that are stripper well property as defined in section 57-51.1-01, to certify to the tax commissioner which wells are stripper wells as defined in section 57-51.1-01 and the depth of those wells, and to certify to the tax commissioner which wells involve secondary or tertiary recovery operations as defined in section 57-51.1-01, and the date of qualification for the oil extraction tax exemption for secondary and tertiary recovery operations.

To adopt and to enforce rules and orders to effectuate the purposes and the intent of this chapter and the commission’s responsibilities under chapter 57-51.1. When adopting a rule, issuing an order, or creating a policy, the commission shall give due consideration to the effect of including locations within this state which may also be under the jurisdiction of the federal government or a tribal government. When reporting information resulting from adopting a rule, issuing an order, or creating a policy that affects locations within this state which may also be under the jurisdiction of the federal government or a tribal government, the commission shall provide sufficient information to indicate the effect of including locations that may also be under the regulatory jurisdiction of the federal government or a tribal government.

To provide for the confidentiality of well data reported to the commission if requested in writing by those reporting the data for a period not to exceed six months. However, the commission may release:

Volumes injected into a saltwater injection well.

Information from the spill report on a well on a site at which more than ten barrels of fluid, not contained on the well site, was released for which an oilfield environmental incident report is required by law.

A person controlling or operating a well, pipeline, receiving tank, storage tank, treating plant, or other receptacle or production facility associated with oil and gas, or with water production, injection, processing, or well servicing, shall report to the commission any leak, spill, or release of fluid. A report to the commission is not required if the leak, spill, or release is crude oil, produced water, or natural gas liquids in a quantity of less than ten barrels cumulative over a fifteen-day time period, remains on the site or facility, and is on a well site where the well was spud after September 1, 2000, or on a facility, other than a well site, constructed after September 1, 2000.

Any written violation notice issued by the commission regarding the notification of a fire, leak, spill, blowout, or leak and spill cleanup must be placed in the well file or facility file and the files must be available for review by the surface owner.

Source:

S.L. 1953, ch. 227, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 38-0804; S.L. 1959, ch. 281, § 1; 1961, ch. 250, § 1; 1975, ch. 314, § 2; 1981, ch. 365, § 1; 1981, ch. 366, § 1; 1983, ch. 395, § 1; 1983, ch. 396, §§ 1 to 3; 1983, ch. 397, § 1; 1983, ch. 398, § 1; 1987, ch. 423, § 1; 1987, ch. 724, § 1; 1989, ch. 434, § 1; 1991, ch. 690, § 1; 1993, ch. 367, § 1; 1997, ch. 51, § 28; 1997, ch. 317, § 1; 2003, ch. 304, § 1; 2007, ch. 310, § 1; 2013, ch. 277, § 2; 2013, ch. 473, § 2; 2015, ch. 254, § § 3-5, effective April 20, 2015; 2015, ch. 256, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 466, § 1, effective January 1, 2016; 2017, ch. 250, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by sections 3 - 5 of chapter 254, S.L. 2015 became effective April 20, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 10 of chapter 254, S.L. 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 256, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 466, S.L. 2015 is effective for taxable years occurring after December 31, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 2 of chapter 473, S.L. 2013 is effective for taxable events occurring after June 30, 2013.

Note.

Section 38-08-04 was amended 5 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 254, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1358; Section 1 of Chapter 256, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1068; Section 5 of Chapter 254, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1358; Section 4 of Chapter 254, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1358; and Section 1 of Chapter 466, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1476.

Section 9 of chapter 466, S.L. 2015 provides,

“EFFECTIVE DATE — EXPIRATION DATE.

Sections 1, (which amended this section) 2, 3, and 5 of this Act are effective for taxable events occurring after December 31, 2015. Section 4 of this Act is effective for taxable events occurring after November 30, 2015. Section 7 of this Act is effective from July 1, 2015, through December 31, 2016, and is thereafter ineffective.”

Section 38-08-04 was amended 2 times by the 2013 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in section 2 of chapter 277, Session Laws 2013, House Bill 1333; and section 2 of chapter 473, Session Laws 2013, House Bill 1198.

Section 11 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act does not apply to the reclamation of an oil or gas-related pipeline or associated facility put into service before August 1, 1983.”

Cross-References.

Petroleum products, regulations, see N.D.C.C. ch. 19-10.

Production tax on oil and gas, see N.D.C.C. ch. 57-51.

38-08-04.1.
Commission may employ examiners.

The industrial commission may use hearing examiners under such rules and regulations as the commission may prescribe.

Source:

S.L. 1961, ch. 251, § 1.

38-08-04.2.
Director of mineral resources — Director of oil and gas — Delegation to director of oil and gas.

The industrial commission is authorized to appoint a director of mineral resources who shall serve at the pleasure of the commission. The director of mineral resources shall carry out the duties of the director of oil and gas along with the duties of director of mineral resources. The commission may set the salary of the director of mineral resources. The commission may delegate to the director of oil and gas all powers the commission has under this title and under rules enacted under this title.

Source:

S.L. 1981, ch. 365, § 4; 1991, ch. 387, § 1; 2005, ch. 42, § 20.

38-08-04.3.
State geologist to assist commission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1991, ch. 387, § 2.

38-08-04.4.
Commission authorized to enter into contracts.

The commission may enter public and private contractual agreements for the plugging or replugging of oil and gas or injection wells, the removal or repair of related equipment, the reclamation of abandoned oil and gas or injection well sites, the reclamation of saltwater handling facility sites, the reclamation of treating plant sites, and the reclamation of oil and gas-related pipelines and associated facilities, including reclamation as a result of leaks or spills from a pipeline or associated facility, if any of the following apply:

The person or company drilling or operating the well or equipment cannot be found, has no assets with which to properly plug or replug the well or reclaim the site, cannot be legally required to plug or replug the well or to reclaim the site, pipeline, or associated pipeline facility, or damage is the result of an illegal dumping incident.

There is no bond covering the well to be plugged or the site to be reclaimed or there is a bond but the cost of plugging or replugging the well or reclaiming the site, pipeline, or associated pipeline facility exceeds the amount of the bond or damage is the result of an illegal dumping incident.

The well, equipment, pipeline, or associated pipeline facility is leaking or likely to leak oil, gas, or saltwater or is likely to cause a serious threat of pollution or injury to the public health or safety.

Sealed bids for any well plugging or reclamation work under this section must be solicited by placing a notice in the official county newspaper of the county in which the work is to be done and in such other newspapers of general circulation in the area as the commission may deem appropriate. Bids must be addressed to the commission and must be opened publicly at the time and place designated in the notice. The contract must be let to the lowest responsible bidder, but the commission may reject any or all bids submitted. If a well or equipment is leaking or likely to leak oil, gas, or saltwater or is likely to cause a serious threat of pollution or injury to the public health or safety, the commission, without notice or the letting of bids, may enter into contracts necessary to mitigate the problem.

The contracts for the plugging or replugging of wells or the reclamation of well sites must be on terms and conditions as prescribed by the commission, but at a minimum the contracts shall require the plugging and reclamation to comply with all statutes and rules governing the plugging of wells and reclamation of sites.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 398, § 2; 1987, ch. 424, § 1; 2007, ch. 314, § 1; 2013, ch. 277, § 3; 2019, ch. 299, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 11 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 provides:

“APPLICATION.

This Act does not apply to the reclamation of an oil or gas-related pipeline or associated facility put into service before August 1, 1983.”

Law Reviews.

North Dakota Law Review: Energy Symposium: Article: Water Resources and Oil and Gas Development: A Survey of North Dakota Law, 87 N.D. L. Rev. 507 (2011).

38-08-04.5.
Abandoned oil and gas well plugging and site reclamation fund — Continuing appropriation — Budget section report.

There is created an abandoned oil and gas well plugging and site reclamation fund.

Revenue to the fund must include:

Fees collected by the oil and gas division of the industrial commission for permits or other services.

Moneys received from the forfeiture of drilling and reclamation bonds.

Moneys received from any federal agency for the purpose of this section.

Moneys donated to the commission for the purposes of this section.

Moneys received from the state’s oil and gas impact fund.

Moneys recovered under the provisions of section 38-08-04.8.

Moneys recovered from the sale of equipment and oil confiscated under section 38-08-04.9.

Moneys transferred from the cash bond fund under section 38-08-04.11.

Such other moneys as may be deposited in the fund for use in carrying out the purposes of plugging or replugging of wells or the restoration of well sites.

Civil penalties assessed under section 38-08-16.

Moneys in the fund may be used for the following purposes:

Contracting for the plugging of abandoned wells.

Contracting for the reclamation of abandoned drilling and production sites, saltwater disposal pits, drilling fluid pits, and access roads.

To pay mineral owners their royalty share in confiscated oil.

Defraying costs incurred under section 38-08-04.4 in reclamation of saltwater handling facilities, treating plants, and oil and gas-related pipelines and associated facilities.

Reclamation and restoration of land and water resources impacted by oil and gas development, including related pipelines and facilities that were abandoned or were left in an inadequate reclamation status before August 1, 1983, and for which there is not any continuing reclamation responsibility under state law. Land and water degraded by any willful act of the current or any former surface owner are not eligible for reclamation or restoration. The commission may expend up to five million dollars per biennium from the fund in the following priority:

For the restoration of eligible land and water that are degraded by the adverse effects of oil and gas development including related pipelines and facilities.

For the development of publicly owned land adversely affected by oil and gas development including related pipelines and facilities.

For administrative expenses and cost in developing an abandoned site reclamation plan and the program.

Demonstration projects for the development of reclamation and water quality control program methods and techniques for oil and gas development, including related pipelines and facilities.

For transfer by the office of management and budget, upon request of the industrial commission, to the environmental quality restoration fund for use by the department of environmental quality for the purposes provided under chapter 23.1-10, if to address environmental emergencies relating to oil and natural gas development, including the disposal of oilfield waste and oil or natural gas production and transportation by rail, road, or pipeline. If a transfer requested by the industrial commission has been made under this subdivision, the department of environmental quality shall request the office of management and budget to transfer from subsequent deposits in the environmental quality restoration fund an amount sufficient to restore the amount transferred from the abandoned oil and gas well plugging and site reclamation fund.

This fund must be maintained as a special fund and all moneys transferred into the fund are appropriated and must be used and disbursed solely for the purposes in this section.

The commission shall report to the budget section of the legislative management on the balance of the fund and expenditures from the fund each biennium.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 398, § 3; 1987, ch. 424, § 2; 2001, ch. 325, §§ 1, 2; 2003, ch. 305, § 1; 2007, ch. 314, § 2; 2013, ch. 277, § 4; 2015, ch. 254, § 1, effective April 20, 2015; 2015, ch. 255, § 6, effective April 20, 2015; 2017, ch. 251, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 199, § 33, effective April 29, 2019; 2019, ch. 299, § 2, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 254, S.L. 2015 became effective April 20, 2015, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 10 of chapter 254, S.L. 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 255, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

Section 38-08-04.5 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 33 of Chapter 199, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2327; and Section 1 of Chapter 251, Session Laws 2017 House Bill 1347.

This section is effective upon the receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the chief of the environmental health section of the state department of health attesting that all necessary federal approvals have been obtained and all necessary federal and other agreements have been amended to ensure the state will continue to meet the primacy requirements it currently satisfies after the transfer of authority, powers, and duties from the state department of health to the department of environmental quality provided under S.L. 2017, ch. 199, § 75. [Contingency met in 2019]

This section is set out above to reflect that the contingency of the section has been met.

Section 38-08-04.5 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 255, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2190; and Section 6 of Chapter 254, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1358.

Section 11 of chapter 277, S.L. 2013 provides: “

APPLICATION.

This Act does not apply to the reclamation of an oil or gas-related pipeline or associated facility put into service before August 1, 1983.”

38-08-04.6.
Oil and gas reservoir data fund — Appropriation.

There is hereby established an oil and gas reservoir data fund to be used for defraying the costs of providing reservoir data compiled by the commission to state, federal, and county departments and agencies and members of the general public. All moneys collected pursuant to section 38-08-04 for providing reservoir data under this section must be deposited in the oil and gas reservoir data fund. This fund must be maintained as a special fund and all moneys transferred into the fund are hereby appropriated and must be used and disbursed solely for the purpose of paying the current cost of providing such information as determined by the commission, based on actual costs.

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 404, § 1.

38-08-04.7.
Right of entry.

The commission, its agents, employees, or contractors shall have the right to enter any land for the purpose of plugging or replugging a well or the restoration of a well site as provided in section 38-08-04.4.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 424, § 3.

38-08-04.8.
Recovery for costs of plugging and reclamation.

If the commission, its agents, employees, or contractors, plugs or replugs a well or reclaims a well site, pipeline facility, production facility, saltwater handling facility, or treating plant under the provisions of sections 38-08-04.4, 38-08-04.5, 38-08-04.7, 38-08-04.8, 38-08-04.9, and 38-08-04.10, the state has a cause of action for all reasonable expenses incurred in the plugging, replugging, or reclamation against the operator at the time the well is required to be plugged and the well or facility is required to be abandoned or any or all persons who own a working interest in the well, pipeline facility, production facility, saltwater handling facility, or treating plant at the time the well is required to be plugged and the well, pipeline facility, production facility, saltwater handling facility, or treating plant abandoned as a result of the ownership of a lease or mineral interest in the property on which the well, pipeline facility, production facility, saltwater handling facility, or treating plant is located. The term “working interest owner” does not mean a royalty owner or an overriding royalty interest owner. The commission shall seek reimbursement for all reasonable expenses incurred in plugging any well or reclaiming any well site, pipeline facility, production facility, saltwater handling facility, or treating plant through an action instituted by the attorney general. The liability of any working interest owner under this section shall be limited to that proportion of the reasonable expenses incurred by the commission that the interest of any such working interest owner bears to the entire working interest in the well. Any money collected in a suit under this section must be deposited in the state abandoned oil and gas well plugging and site reclamation fund. Any suit brought by the commission for reimbursement under this section may be brought in the district court for Burleigh County, the county in which the plugged well or reclaimed well site, pipeline facility, production facility, saltwater handling facility, or treating plant is located, or the county in which any defendant resides.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 424, § 4; 2019, ch. 299, § 3, effective August 1, 2019.

38-08-04.9.
Confiscation of equipment and salable oil to cover plugging and reclamation costs.

When the commission intends to exercise or has exercised its right to plug a well or reclaim a well site, pipeline facility, production facility, saltwater handling facility, or treating plant, the commission, as compensation for its costs, may confiscate any equipment and salable oil at the well site, pipeline facility, production facility, saltwater handling facility, or treating plant. The equipment subject to confiscation is limited to that owned by the operator, former operator, or working interest owner. If the commission exercises its authority under this section and there is salable oil at the well site, that oil must be confiscated. The commission shall pay the mineral owners the royalty interest in the oil confiscated at the well site. In determining the mineral owners and their royalty interests, the commission may rely upon the most recent division order it is able to obtain. If one is unavailable or the commission finds the order unreliable, the commission may rely upon any other source of information the commission deems reasonable to determine and pay mineral owners. A confiscation must be by an order of the commission after notice and hearing. A confiscation order transfers title to the commission.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 424, § 5; 2003, ch. 305, § 2; 2019, ch. 299, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

38-08-04.10.
Penalties and other relief.

The plugging or replugging of a well or reclamation of a well site by the commission, its agents, employees, or contractors, shall not prevent the commission from seeking penalties or other relief provided by law from any person who is required by statutes, rules, or order of the commission to plug or replug a well or reclaim the surface.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 424, § 6.

38-08-04.11.
Cash bond fund for plugging oil and gas wells and reclamation of oil and gas well sites — Appropriation.

There is hereby created a cash bond fund for the plugging of abandoned oil and gas wells and the reclamation of abandoned oil and gas well sites.

From all moneys held or controlled by the commission under subdivision d of subsection 1 of section 38-08-04, there is to be deposited in the cash bond fund such amount as determined by the commission but such amount may not exceed an amount equal to an annual return of two percent of the cash bond deposit.

Moneys in the cash bond fund are hereby appropriated to the commission to be used for the following purposes:

Defraying costs incurred in the plugging of abandoned oil and gas wells, and related activities.

Defraying costs incurred in the reclamation of abandoned oil and gas drilling and production sites, saltwater disposal pits, drilling fluid pits, and access roads, and related activities.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 435, § 1.

38-08-04.12.
Reclamation of land disturbed by oil and gas activity.

Any land disturbed by construction of well sites, treating plants, saltwater handling facilities, access roads, underground gathering pipelines and associated facilities, and from remediation of leaks or spills within the jurisdiction of the commission shall be reclaimed as close as practicable to its original condition as it existed before the construction of the well site or other disturbance. The commission, with the consent of the appropriate government land manager or surface owner, may waive the requirement of reclamation of the site and access road after a well is plugged or treating plant or saltwater handling facility is decommissioned. The commission shall record documentation of the waiver with the recorder of the county in which the site or road is located.

This section may not be construed to require removal of a properly reclaimed reserve pit or a properly abandoned underground gathering pipeline.

A person may not bring a legal proceeding under this section, unless the person has exhausted all administrative remedies.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 252, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.